Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.280

Regulation of watercourses.

The state in the exercise of its sovereign and police power authorizes any county alone or acting jointly with any other county to regulate and control the flow of waters, both navigable and nonnavigable, within such county or counties, for the purpose of preventing floods which may threaten or cause damage, public or private.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.280. Prior: 1921 c 30 s 1; RRS s 4057-1.]